assets/hyph-de-1996.dic
ws2ky
ws2t
w2s1u
2w1t2
wti2
3w2uc
wuch4sa
wu2c2hs
wuch4sc
wuch4sp2
3w2u2ec
wue3le
w2uel
3wue2r1f
3wue2r1g
wue2r4s
5wuers1t
2w1u2f
wun4d3a
wun1
wu2n1d
wun4dä
w4un2d3r2
2wu2n1g
wun4g3r2
wung5sc
wun2g2s1
wu2n2s
wuns4ch5ei
wun1sc
wuns2c2h5l
wur4f3a
wu2r1f
wur4f5ei
wur1fe
wur4fel
wur4fer
wur4f3l
wur4f3o
3wu2r1m
wur4m3a
wur4mei
wur1me
wur4mer
wur5m4es4
wur6m5e2s1s
wur4m3i
wu2r2s
3wurs1t
wurs2t5a
wus2
wus3te
wus1t
w2u2t3
wu2t1z2
3w2üc
3wüh
3wü2r1f
3wü2r1g
3wür2s1t
wü2r1s
2w1w
2w1z
x1a
1xa.
2xa1b
xa2be
xa2b1r2
x2ab2y2
1x2ac
1x2a1d
1x2a1e2
x2a3fl
1x2a1g2
xal3a
xa2l2l3
xa2m
xa3m2er
xa1me
2xan
x2an.
xa2na
x3a2n1b2
3x2a1ne
xant4h
xa2n1t
3x4an3ti
3x4anzi
xa2n1z
xa2r
1x2as
2xa2u
xa2z
2x1b2
2xc
xcal2
x1ca
x1ce
x1ch
x1c2l2
2x1d
xda2
xdi2e
1xe
2x1e1f
2x3e2g
2x1ei
2xek
xe2l
3xel.
xe1l3a
x4e3lei
xe1le
2xe2mp
xe1m
x2en
xe2n1k2
xe2n3s2
2x1e2p
2x3e2r1l
xer4l2a
xe2r3s2
x3e2r1z
2x1eu
2x1ex
2x1f2
x3fi
2x1g2
2x1h
x2i
2xia
xi1b2
x2i1c
xich4
xi3da2n
xi1d
xide2
xi4d3ei
xi4d3e1m
xidi2
x3i2do
3xi2e
3xi1k2
xi4lar
xi1la
xi4l3a2u
xi4l3er
xi1le
xi2lo
xi2l3u2
1xim
x3i2mp
xi2n3s2
1x2ip
xi2s3a
3xi1sc
x2i2s3e
xi4s3or
xi1so
xi2s1s2
xi2su
x3i2tu
xi1t
2x1k2
xkal2
x1ka
2x2l2
x3la
x3lä
x3le
x3lo
2x1m
xmon2
x1mo
2x1n
x1o1d
xo2du
2xo1e2
x1o2l
xone2n4
x2o1ne
xo4n5e2n1d
x1o2r
xos2
x2o1t
2x1ö2
2x1p2
x3par
x1pa
x3pa2u
x3ph
x3plo3r
x1pl2
xp2lo
xpor4ta
x1po
xpo2r1t
xpor6t5er6
xpor4t5r2
x3pu
2x1r
2x1s2
x3s1h
xs1t2
2x1t
xt1a
x2ta2b
x2tak
xt4a1ne
x2ta2u
xt1ä
x2tän
x2täs
xtb1lo4
x2t1b2
xtbl2
xtbloc2k5
xtb2loc
x2t3e2b
x2t3e2d
x4t3e2i1g
x2t3ein
x2t3el
x4t3e2n1t
x4t3e2r4f
x4t3e2r4g2
x4t3e2r4k2
x4t3e2r4l
xte2r4s
x4t5er1sc
x4t5er1s2e
x4t3e2r1w
x4t3e2r4z
x2t3e2v
x2t3ex1
xtfi4l
x2t1f2
xt1fi
xt1h
x2thi
x2t3i1d
xti4la
x3ti4lin
xti1li
x4t5il4lu
xti2l1l
x2t3im
xt3i2n1d
xt3i2n3f2
xt3i2n1h2
xt3i2n1s
xt1o2
x2to1b
x2tor
xtr4a3b4
xtr2
xtra3c
xtra3l
x4t5ra2n1d
xt5r4aum
xtra2u
x2t3rec
xt2re
x4t3rep
x4t3r2es
x4t3rol
x2t3s2
xtu3e
x2t3um
x2t3un1
x2tup
xtu5ral
xt2ur
xtu1ra
1xu
x2u1a
xu1e
x1um
xu2n1
2x1u2n1t
xu2s1
xu1sa2
xu2s1s2
xus3t
2x2v
x3ve
xvil2
x3vo
2x1w
1xy.
1yac
y2ach
yach4t5r2
ya2c2h1t
yach2t5s4
ya1h
ya1i2
y3al.
ya3la
y3a2l1b
ya2n2g
y3a2n1k
y3a2n1z
ya2ro
ya3s2p2
y1a2u
y1ä1t
yb2r2
y1b
y1c
y1cer4
y4chia
y2c2h3n2
yd3al
y1d
ydri2
ydr2
y1dri1d3
yd2ro3
y1e
y2ec
ye2d
y2e1f
y2el
ye2ne
ye2n2n
3y2e1no
yer3a2
y2e1ri
ye2r2n3
y2es.
y2e1s2p2
ye2th
ye1t
y1f2
yfen2
y1fe
yg2l
y1g
ygro3s
ygr2
yg2ro
y1h
y2hr2
2y1i2
y1k2
yke3n
y2k3s
y2k3t
yl3ac
yl3ae1t
yla2e
y3lak
y2l3a2m
yla2n
yla1n3e
y5l4ant.
yla2n1t
y5l4ante
y5l4an3ti
yl3ar
y3la1t
yl3ä1t
y2l3c
y2le.
y1le
yle3is
y2l3es
y2l3e2t
ylinde4
y1li
yli2n1d
yl2i4ne.
yli1ne
yli4ne3s
y2l1k2
yl4l3ak
y2l1l
ylo1i2d3
y1lo
yloni5e
yl2o1n2i
yl3ora
y2l1s2
yltri3
y2l1t
yltr2
y1lu
2ym
ym4ae
y1ma
ym4an
ym4är
y1mä
ym4el
y1me
y2m1p2
ym4pha
ym1ph
ym4phor
ympi3e
ym3pi
2yn
y1na
ynae4r
y2n3an
ynä2r
y1nä
yndro6ma
y2n1d
yndr2
ynd2ro
y3ne.
y1ne
y2ne4c
y2n1k2
y1n1o
yno2d
yn2o2t
yno2v
y2n3t2
ynta2
y1nu
y2o1d
yof2
yo2f1f3
1y2o3g
yog4a3
yona2l5s4
y2o1na
yon4n4e
yo2n1n
y3o2n1t
y3o2pe
yo3ru
yo1s
y3os.
y3ot.
yo1t
y1ou
yout3a
yo2u1t
2y1p
yp3a2b
y1pa
ypa2n
y2p3än
y1pä
y2pec
y1pe
ype4r
y4pe1sc
y2p3i2d2
ypi2e
y2p3in
y2p3lo
y1pl2
ypo3t2
y1po
y2p1s
yp3t1h
y2p1t
y2p3um
y1pu
y2pü
y1r
yr2ae3i
yra2e
yra2s4t
yr2ä3i
y2r1h2
yri5er.
yr2ie
yri5e2r1s
yro1
yro4s5te
yros1t
y2r1r2
2ys
ysa2u2
y1sa
y1s2c
y1se1
ysein4
yse2n3
yse3s2
y3sh2o
y2s1h
y3s2n
ys2po
ysp2
yst4e
ys1t
ys5t2e1m
y2ste4n
ys4the
y2sth
ysti5er
ys4tol
ys3to4le
ys4tri
ystr2
y3s2ty
y1su2
y2s3ur
y1s2z2
yte2n3
y1t
y2t2es
yt2h
yt4he
ythi3e
y3to
yto3s2
y1u
yu2r
yu1re3
yve1t2
y1v
yvon4
ywu2r2s4
y1w
y1x
y1y
yze5r4i
y1z
1z
2z1aa
2z1a1b
2z1a2c1c
2z3ach
za3cha
za3chä
2z1a2d
za2e
z3ae2c
z2aeh
2z3ae1m
4z3ae2n1d
4z5aen2g2s1
zae2n1g
z3ae2r1m
z2a3e2s1s
2z3ae1t
4z3a2eus
zae2u
4z3ae2u1ß
z2a3f4a
2z3a2f1f
z2a3fl
z2a2ga
za1g
za3gr2
3z2ah
zah4n5er4
za2hn
zah1n2e
za3hol
z2ai
za3im
z1ak
2z3a2k1k2
z2a3kl2
2z3a2l1b
2z3a2l1d
z2a1l4e
2z3a2l1l
2z3a2l1p
2z3a2l1t
2z1am
2z3a2na3
2z1a2n1b2
za2n3d2
2z1a2n1f
4z3anga
za2n1g
4z5ange1b
z5angel
z3angl
4z3an2g2s1
2z1a2n1h2
zan4ka
za2n1k
zan4kl2
2z1a2n1l2
2z3a2n1m2
2za1no2
2z1a2n1p2
2z1a2n1r2
2z3a2n1s2
z4ans.
zan3ti3
za2n1t
2z1a2n1w
z2ao2
zapf3l
2z3a2p2o
zap4p1le
za2p1p
zap1p1l2
2z1a2q
3z2ar.
2z3a2r1b
2z1a2r1c
z2ar2e3s
za1re
2z3a2r1g
2z3a2r1m
4z3arti
za2r1t
zar4t3r2
zar2ts4
2z3a2r1z
z1as
za2s2b2
zas2p2
z1a1t
3z4a2u1b
za2u
2z3au2f3
2z3a2u1g
2z3auk
3z2aun1
z3au1r
z3au2s1b2
z3au2s1f2
4z3au2s3g2
4z3au2s1l2
4z3au2s1s2
4z3au2s1w
2z3a2u1ß
2z3a2u1t
2z1ä2c
zäh4lei
zä2hl
zäh1le
zäh4lin
zäh1li
4z3äh2n1l2
zä2hn
zä2h3r
2z1äm
2z3ä2n1d
z3än2g2s1
zä2n1g
z1äp
z3ä2r1g
2z3ä2r1m
2z1ä1t
2z1ä2u1g
2z3äus
2z1ä2u1ß
2z1äx
2z1b2
z3be
zbe1r4e
zb2er
z3bo
z1b1u2e3b
zbu2e
z1b1ü3b
zb2y2
2z1c
2z1d2
zdan2
zdä1
zdi2e
zdi5str2
zdis1t4
z3d1s
zd1u2e3b
zd1ü3b
4z3e4b2en
ze1b
zebra3
z2ebr2
4z3e2cho
ze2c2h3s
ze1d2
ze4di1t
z2e1e2
2z3e2f1f
ze1f
zef2l
z2e1g2
ze4gal
ze4he1m
ze1he
ze3he4n3
ze2h2l
zehn3a
ze2hn
zeh4n5e2n
zeh1n2e
zeh2n1s4
zei5cho
ze2ic
ze2i3f2
zei1k2
zei5le4
zeilen5
2z3ein
ze3in.
z4ein4a
zein4de
zei2n1d
zei4n3e
zeinen4
z4ei2n3o2
ze5in4se
zei2n1s
zeis2
zei3s1k2
zei3sp2
zei3s1t
z2ei4t3a
ze2i1t
z2ei4tä
ze2ite4
zei4te1b
zei4tei
zei4tel
zei4t5er5
zei4t3o
zei4tr2
zeit5re
zeit5ri
zeit6sto
z4ei2ts
zei1t1s1t2
ze2la
zel5a4b1r2
zela1b
zel3a4d
zel3a2e
zel3am
zela4n
zel5a1n5e
zel5a2n1g
zel3a2u
ze2l3ä
ze2l3d4
ze4le1d
ze1le
zelei6er
z4elei
zele2i1e
ze4l5e2i1g
ze5leis
z3e4lek
4zel2e2k1t
4z3ele1me
ze2le1m
ze4l3en
z4e4l3er
zele1r5e
ze4les
ze2l3e2x
ze2l3i1d
ze1li
zel3in
ze4li2n3f2
4z3e4l2i1t
zel4la1b
ze2l1l
zel4l5ac
zel4l5a2r6t
zel6lein
zel1le
1zelle2r6z
zell4er
zel2l3s4
z2e2lo
zel3o1b
ze2l1p2
zels4t
ze2ls
zel5ste
1zel3s1z2
zel4ta2u
ze2l1t
zel4t5in
ze1lu2
zel5u2n1k
ze1lun1
ze4lus
zembe4
ze1m
ze2m1b2
ze1m4e
ze4mis
ze1mi
2z3e2mp
zen4ade
zen1a
zena1d
ze1na4g
ze5na2t1t
ze1na1t
zen3a2u
ze2n1ä
zende4c
ze2n1d
zende4k
zende4s
ze3nec
ze1ne
ze1n5e1n5e
zen5erke
zene2r1k2
zen5e2rn
zen5ertr2
zene2r1t
ze4n3e2r1w
ze2n3f2
4z5en4ge.
ze2n1g
zenge6ne
zengene6r
4z3en2g3p2
zeng4r2
ze4ni2d
ze1n2i
zen5i2n1n
ze2n1k2
ze2n3n
ze2n3o
zen4san
ze2n1s
zen1sa
zensch4
zen1sc
zen4se1m
zen1se
zen4ser
zens4po
zensp2
4z5ent3na
ze2n1t
zen2t1n2
zent5ra2e
zent2r2
zen2t3s
zen4z5ar
1ze2n1z
zen6z5e2r1s2
zen6ze2r1t
zen6ze2r1w
zen4zin
zen4zy
ze1o2r
z2eo
ze4pen
ze1pe
z2e3p2f
zep1pe3
ze2p1p
zer3a1d
zer3a2e
zer3a4g
zer3an
ze4r3a1t
ze2r3ä
6z5erei2g3n
ze1re
ze2r2e2i1g
ze4r3ein
ze4re1mi
zer2e1m
zer5e2n1d
zer5e2r1w
ze4r3e4t
4z5erfol
ze2r1f
zer1fo
4z5erfül
zer1fü
4z5ergae
ze2r1g
4z3ergä
zer4gon
4z3er4gu
ze4r3i4d
ze1ri
zerin6di
ze4r3i2n1d
ze2r3i2n4f2
ze2r3i2n4h2
ze4rin6te
ze4r3i2n1t
5zerl.
ze2r1l
zer6la2n1g
zerl2a
zer3lan
zer6l2a2u1b
zerla2u
zer4läu
4z5erle1b
zer1le
zer4lei
zer1lo4
zer6maec
zer3ma
ze2r1m
4z5er4mäc
zer1m2ä
5zer1me
zer4na2n
ze2rn
zer1na
zer4n5e4b
zer1ne
zer6ne2r1b
zer5obe
zero1b
ze3ros
ze4rou
ze3rös
2z3e2r1q
ze2r1s2
z5ersae
zer1sa
4z5ersa1t
zersa2u4
4z3er1sä
zer3s1k2
6z5er6s2trec
zers2tr2
zers1t
zerst2re
zer4t5a4g
ze2r1t
zer4tar
zerte4
zer6t5e2mp
zert2e1m
zerten4
zerter5
zer6t5e1re
zer6te2r1l
zer4t5in
zer4ton
zer3to
zer6t5ra2u
zertr2
zer2t3s4
6z5erwe2r1b
ze2r1w
zer4zä
1ze2r1z
z4es.
ze1s2a
zes3a2u
ze3sch
ze1sc
zes3er
ze1se
zes4ph
z2e1sp2
zes4sa4
ze2s1s
zess5a1g
zess5an
zes4se1b
zes1se
zes3sen4
zes6s5e2n1d
zes4ser4
zess5e2r1f
1zess5e2r1z
zes6s5ort.
z4es1so
zesso2r1t
zes6s5or6te.
zes6s5or6te4n
zes6s5or2ts
zes4s1pa
zessp2
zes4s1po
zes4sum
zes1su
zes4s5ur4
ze5sta2u
zes2ta
zes1t
zes4tie
ze5stra
zes2tr2
4z3e4tap
ze1t
4ze1ta1t
2z3e2th
4zet2ts
ze2t1t
zeu2g3a
ze2u1g
zeu4gei
zeu4gel
zeu4g5e4m
zeuge4n
zeu6g5er1sc
zeuge2r1s
zeu4g3r2
2z3e2ul
ze3um
ze3ur
2z1e2x1
2z1f2
zfen2
z1fe
2z1g2
zge3n4a
zge3r4a
zge6r5in6nu
zge1ri
zgeri2n1n
zger4s5e
zge2r1s
2z1h2
zha2u4t3
zha2u
zi3af
zi5alei
zi1al
zi2a1le
zi5ale2n1g
zi5alim
zi2a1li
zi3a2n1g
zi2ar
zi1b2
zi3cho
z2ic
zich6t5er6
zi2c2h1t
zi4d3ak
zi1d
zi4d3ei
3zie
zie4hei
zie1he
zie4l3a
zie1le4
zie4l5e1b
zi4e4lei
zi4e4l5er
zie4le1t
zie4l3i
zi3e2l1l
zi1e2n
zierde4
zie2r1d
zie4r5ei
zi2e1re
zi3es.
zi3e2s1s
zi3es1t
zi3e1su
1zi3e2s1z2
zif4fr2
z2if
zi2f1f
zi3fl
zi4ge1c
zi1g
4z3i4gel
zig3sp2
zi2gs1
zi4kon
zi1k
zi1k2o
zi1l4e
zi4mi1t
zi1mi
2z3i2mp
zi2m2t3
4z3inde
zi2n1d
1zi4n5e2r4z
zi1ne
z2i4n3e1t
zi4n3in
zi1n2i
4z3i4n3i1t
zin4kae
zi2n1k
zin1ka
1zin6k5e2r1z
zin4k3l2
zin2ks4
zin4na
zi2n1n
zin4sa
zi2n1s
zin5sas
4z5insel
zin1se
zin4ser
4z3insu2f
zin1su
zi2o
zi1o3d
zi3on.
zi1on2
zi3o2n1s3
zi1p4a
z2ip
zi2r1k2
zir2ks3
4z3ir3ri
zi2r1r
1zi3s2z2
3zi1t
zi4t3an
z2ite2
zithe4
zi2t3o2
2z1j
2z1k2
z3ko
zko3e1f
z3kr2
zk1u2e3b
z1ku
zk1ü3b
z1kü
z3ky
2z1l
zlan6d5er
z3la2n1d
zl4ei5ti
z1le
zle2i1t
zle3s
z3lo
2z1m2
zmau4s
z1ma
zma2u
2z1n2
zna5che
z3ne
znebe4
zne1b
z2n1ei3
2z3o4as
zo1a
2z1o1b
2z3oe2d
zoe2f
3z4o2e1g
2z3oek
4z3oel.
zoe2l
4z3oe2ls
z1of
zo2gl
z2o1g
2z1oh
zo4li1g
zo1li
zol4l3a4
zo2l1l
zol4l5ei
zol1le
zol6l5e2n6t5
zoller4
zol6le2r1f
zol6l5e2r1k2
zol6l5e2r1l
zol6le2r3t
zol4lin
zol1li
zol4lo
zol2ls4
zoll5ste
zolls1t
z3o2l2y
3zon
zo2n3s2
zon4te1b
zo2n1t
zon4t5er
3z2o2o
zoo3s
2z3o2pe
zop4f5e4n
zop1fe
2z1o2p1t2
2z3ora
z3o2r1c
z3o2r1d
z3o2r1g
zo2ri
zor4n3a
zo2rn
zor4ner
zor1ne
2z3o2r1t
2z3os1z2
zo2t3a
zo1t
2z1ou
z2o2w
2z1ox
zo2ze
zo1z
2z1ö2d
2z1ö2f
3zö1g
2z1ök
z1ö2l
2z3öl.
2zö1le
z2ö1li
z2ö2l1l
2z1ö2l1s
2z1p2
z3p1n
2z1q
2z1r2
z3ra
z3ru
2z1s2
z3sa
zsa2u2
zsch2
z1sc
zs2e3r4u
z1se
z3s1h
z1si1
z3s1k2
z3s1l2
z3sp2
zs1t2
z1su1
zs2ui2
2z1t
z2t3a2b1r2
zta1b
zta2n
z4t3a1n3e
z4t5anze
1zta2n1z
z2t3ar
zt2ee2
zte3eh
zt3e1he
z2teh
zt5ei2n1s
z2tein
z4t3e2n1t
1z4t3e2r1z
z3t4es
zte3s4k2
zte5s2tr2
ztes1t
zt3hel
z2t3hi
z2t3ho
z2t1hu
zt3i2n1d
zt3i2n3f2
zt3i2n1s
zt4or
zt4ram
ztr2
z2t3rec
zt2re
z2t3s2
z4t3u2r1s
zt2ur
1z2t1z2
zu1
z2u1b2
zucht5o
z2uc
zu2c2h1t
zucht5r2
zuch2ts4
z2u1d2
zudi4e
2z1u2e2b
zu3e2b1b
zu3e2b1n2
z2ue2k
z2u2el
z2u2en
zu3e2n1t
zu4e2r1c
zu4e2rn
zue4r3o4
zu4ers.
zue2r1s
z2ue2t
zu3f2
zu4g5a2n1s
z2u1g
zu4g3ar
zu4g3a1t
zug5eis
zu4g5e2n1t
zu2g1g2
zug5i2n1n
zu4gl2a
zug1l
zu4glä
zu4g1lö
zug2r2
zug5r4a2u
zug4san
zu2gs1
zug1sa
2z3u2hr
z2ui2
zu3le
2z3u2l1t
zu3lu
2z3um.
2z3u2m1b2
zume2n4s4
zu1me
2z1u2m1f2
2z1u2m1g2
2z3u2m1h2
2z1u2m1k2
2z1u2m1l
zu3mo
2z1u2m1r2
2z3u2m1s
2z3u2m4t2
zu3m2u
2z3u2m1w2
4z3u2n1a1b
zun1
zun4am
zu3n2e
4z3une1m
4z3un3fa
zu2n1f2
4z3un3fä
zun3ge4n5
zu2n1g
4z3unge1t
4z3ungl
zun2g2s3
4z3u4nio
zu1n2i
2z1u2n1r2
2z3u2n1s
2z1u2n1t
2z1u2n1w
z2uo2
zu2p4fi
zu3r4a
2z3u2r1k
2z3u2r1l
2z3u2rn
2z3u2r1s
2z3u2r1t
zu3s2
zu5s2ch4
zu1sc
zu1s4e
zus4p2
zu3t4a
z2u1t
zu3te
zut4r2
zuve4
zu1v
1z2u1z2
2z1ü2b
zü2r3c
2z1v
4zwaer
z1w
4z3waes
2zwaf
2zwa1g
2z3wah
2zwal
4zwa2n1d
z4wa2n1g
2z3wa2p
2z3wa2s
zwas1se4
zwa2s1s
2zwäc
2zwär
2z3wäs
2zwe1b
z2w2ec
4z3wech
2zwe1d
2z3w2e1g
zwe2g3s1
2z3weh
5z4we2i1g
4z3weil
4zwein
zwei5sc
zwei6t5e2r6k2
zwe2i1t
zwe2ite
2zwel
2zwen
z4we2r1g
4zwe2r1k
4zwe2r1t
2zwes
z2w2ic
2z3wi1d
zwi2e
4z5wie1d
4z3wi2l1d
5z4wi2n1g
4z5wi2n1t
4zwi2r1r
zwi2r
4z3wi2r1t
z4wi1sc
4z3wi2s1s
z4wis1t
2zwur
z3wu2r4m3
2zwü
zy3an.
5zyk1lu
zy1k2
zykl2
zy2le
zy2m3i
z2ym
2z1z
zz2a
zz1a3t
z2z3i1d
z2z3i2k
zzi2n
zz3i1n2i
zzi3s2
zz2o
zzol2
z2z3or
zz2ö
zzu2g4s1
zzu1
zz2u1g
zz2w
}
\endinp2u1t
\e2n1d
\endi2n1p2
\endin3pu
